Alabama, session 2026rs, HB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 11-98-4.3 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§11-98-4.3
(a) For the purposes of this section, the term
"readiness" refers to the capability of a district, including
a public safety answering point, to expedite the answering,
receiving, and transferring of 911 calls and texts to
efficiently dispatch the appropriate emergency service
provider as soon as possible to a correct location where
property or life may be in jeopardy.
(b) The 911 Board shall establish a system that is
based upon best practices as adopted by nationally recognized
associations such as the National Emergency Number Association
and the Association of Public Safety Communications Officials
to measure the readiness of district public safety services
through the collection of data related to a district's
Page 1

through the collection of data related to a district's
HB268 Enrolled
answering, receiving, transferring, and dispatching functions
relating to 911 calls, including voice, text messages, photos,
and videos.
(c) The 911 Board may collect data including, but not
limited to, all of the following for each district in the
state:
(1) 911 call volume.
(2) Time to answer 911 calls.
(3) Time to process emergency calls in accordance with
Section 11-98-11.
(4) Number of answered emergency calls versus
unanswered emergency calls.
(5) Number of dropped calls.
(6) Number of calls reporting a crime.
(d) Compliance by the 911 Board with this section may
be funded as an advisory service pursuant to Section
11-98-5.2(b)(7)b. or from any outside source of funding
received by the 911 Board.
(e)(1) The Attorney General, based upon a complaint
received concerning the performance of a local communication
district, may refer the matter to the 911 Board, which shall
conduct a performance audit to review and evaluate the
readiness of the district.
(2) A performance audit of a district by the 911 Board
may include any of the following:
a. Interviewing any individual who may have knowledge
concerning district performance, including members of the
district board of commissioners, the director of the PSAP,
Page 2

district board of commissioners, the director of the PSAP,
HB268 Enrolled
public safety telecommunicators, heads of local emergency
service providers, first responders, and residents who have
submitted a complaint.
b. On-site inspection of a PSAP, PSAP equipment or
technical functionality, and monitoring PSAP operations in
real time.
(3)a. Upon completion of a performance audit or no
later than 60 days from commencement of the audit, the 911
Board shall approve and submit a formal written report to the
Attorney General which contains: (i) an evaluation of the
district's readiness; and (ii) findings of specific
operational deficiencies confirmed or disclosed by the audit.
b. If operational deficiencies are confirmed, the audit
report required under paragraph a. shall include a remediation
plan which prescribes measures to bring the district to an
acceptable level of readiness, including, but not limited to,
any of the following:
1. Training requirements for public safety
telecommunicators.
2. Hiring additional public safety telecommunicators.
3. Upgrade of technology, including replacement or
acquisition of PSAP communications hardware or software.
4. Amendment of PSAP operating protocols, scripts, and
recordkeeping.
c. The audit report shall be made public and may be
posted on the website of the Attorney General or the 911
Board.
(4) Pursuant to the performance audit, the 911 Board is
Page 3

(4) Pursuant to the performance audit, the 911 Board is
HB268 Enrolled
authorized to supervise the implementation of a remediation
plan in the district.
(f) The 911 Board shall adopt rules in accordance with
the Alabama Administrative Procedure Act which are necessary
to implement the system described in this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4

1, 2026.
HB268 Enrolled








100
101
102 ________________________________________________
103 Speaker of the House of Representatives
104
105
106
107 ________________________________________________
108 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
109
110
111 House of Representatives
112
113 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
114 was passed by the House 12-Feb-26.
115
116 John Treadwell
117 Clerk
118
119
120
121
122
123 Senate 01-Apr-26 Passed
124
125
126
Page 5